test/src/morphology/N-kuoppu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kuoppu: # Noun 'pit / kuoppa' - full paradigm
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Nom: kuoppu
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Gen: kuopan
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Acc: [kuoppu, kuopan]
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Par: kuoppua
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Tra: kuopakse
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Abe: [kuopatta, kuopata, kuopattah]
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Com: kuopanke
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ine: kuopas
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ela: [kuopaspäi, kuopas]
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ill: kuoppah
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ade: kuopal
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Abl: [kuopalpäi, kuopal]
     kuoppu+N+Sg+All: kuopale
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ess: kuopannu
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ter: kuopassah
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Apr: kuopalluo
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Nom: kuopat
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Gen: kuoppien
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Acc: kuopat
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Par: kuoppii
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Tra: kuopikse
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Abe: [kuopitta, kuopita, kuopittah]
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Com: kuoppienke
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ine: kuopis
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ela: [kuopispäi, kuopis]
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ill: kuoppih
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ade: kuopil
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Abl: [kuopilpäi, kuopil]
     kuoppu+N+Pl+All: kuopile
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ess: kuopinnu
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ins: kuopin
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Apr: kuoppielluo
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: kuoppugi
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: kuopangi
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [kuoppugi, kuopangi]
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: kuoppuagi
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: kuopaksegi
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [kuopattagi, kuopatagi, kuopattahgi]
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: kuopankegi
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: kuopasgi
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [kuopaspäigi, kuopasgi]
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: kuoppahgi
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: kuopalgi
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [kuopalpäigi, kuopalgi]
     kuoppu+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: kuopalegi
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: kuopannugi
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: kuopassahgi
     kuoppu+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: kuopalluogi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: kuopatgi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: kuoppiengi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: kuopatgi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: kuoppiigi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: kuopiksegi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [kuopittagi, kuopitagi, kuopittahgi]
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: kuoppienkegi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: kuopisgi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [kuopispäigi, kuopisgi]
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: kuoppihgi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: kuopilgi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [kuopilpäigi, kuopilgi]
     kuoppu+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: kuopilegi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: kuopinnugi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: kuopingi
     kuoppu+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: kuoppielluogi
